Utah statutes.
31A-22-314.   Mandatory coverage.

(1)  As used in this section, "owner's or operator's security" has the same meaning as defined in Section 41-12a-103.

(2) (a)  A rental company shall maintain owner's or operator's security meeting the requirements of Title 41, Chapter 12a, Financial Responsibility of Motor Vehicle Owners and Operators Act.

(b)  Owner's or operator's security maintained by a rental company under Subsection (2)(a) applies only when there is no other valid or collectible insurance or other form of security meeting the minimum requirements of Title 41, Chapter 12a, Financial Responsibility of Motor Vehicle Owners and Operators Act.

(c)  If other valid or collectible insurance or other form of security satisfies the minimum requirements of Title 41, Chapter 12a, Financial Responsibility of Motor Vehicle Owners and Operators Act, on a loss involving a rental vehicle, a rental company's obligation under Title 41, Chapter 12a, Financial Responsibility of Motor Vehicle Owners and Operators Act, is satisfied.

(d)  When no other valid or collectible insurance or other form of security exists meeting the minimum requirements of Title 41, Chapter 12a, Financial Responsibility of Motor Vehicle Owners and Operators Act, a rental company shall provide security meeting the minimum requirements of Title 41, Chapter 12a, Financial Responsibility of Motor Vehicle Owners and Operators Act, for losses involving a rental vehicle.

(3)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to expand or reduce the liability of a rental company or to impair a rental company's right to indemnity, contribution, or both.



Amended by Chapter 391, 2007 General Session

